Missouri, session 2026, HB1995.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 301.064, 301.120, and 301.130, RSMo, are repealed and three
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 301.064, 301.120, and 301.130,
to read as follows:
301.064. 1. The annual registration fee for a land improvement contractors'
commercial motor vehicle is three hundred fifty dollars. The maximum gross weight for
which such a vehicle may be registered is eighty thousand pounds. Transporting for hire by
such a motor vehicle is prohibited.
2. Upon application to the director of revenue accompanied by an affidavit signed by
the owner or owners stating that the motor vehicle to be licensed as a land improvement
contractors' commercial motor vehicle shall not be operated in any manner other than as
prescribed in section 301.010, and by the amount of the registration fee prescribed above, and
otherwise complying with the laws relating to the registration and licensing of motor vehicles,
the owner or owners shall be issued a [set of] land improvement contractors' license [plates]
plate. The director of revenue shall by regulation determine the characteristic features of land
improvement contractors' license [plates] plate so that they may be readily identified as such.
301.120. 1. When the owner of a motor vehicle moves the vehicle to another state,
[he] the owner shall return the license plates to the director of revenue within ninety days or
upon the expiration of the period of reciprocity granted by the new state of residence; or if the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1995 2
owner of a motor vehicle ceases to operate the vehicle in Missouri, [he] the owner shall
return the license plates to the director of revenue within ninety days.
2. For motor vehicles that require the issuance of only one license plate under
section 301.130 on or after August 28, 2026, an owner whose motor vehicle has a front
license plate on August 28, 2026, shall surrender the front license plate to the
department of revenue.
301.130. 1. The director of revenue, upon receipt of a proper application for
registration, required fees and any other information which may be required by law, shall
issue to the applicant a certificate of registration in such manner and form as the director of
revenue may prescribe and [a set of] only one license [plates] plate, or other evidence of
registration, as provided by this section. The provisions of this subsection regarding
issuance of only one license plate shall also apply to personalized license plates issued
under section 301.144 and special license plates issued under this chapter, except as
otherwise specified in subsection 3 of this section. Each license plate or set of license
plates shall bear the name or abbreviated name of this state, the words "SHOW-ME STATE",
the month and year in which the registration shall expire, and an arrangement of numbers or
letters, or both, as shall be assigned from year to year by the director of revenue. The plate or
plates shall also contain fully reflective material with a common color scheme and design for
each type of license plate issued pursuant to this chapter. The plate or plates shall be clearly
visible at night, and shall be aesthetically attractive. Special plates for qualified disabled
veterans will have the "DISABLED VETERAN" wording on the license plates in preference
to the words "SHOW-ME STATE" and special plates for members of the National Guard will
have the "NATIONAL GUARD" wording in preference to the words "SHOW-ME STATE".
2. The arrangement of letters and numbers of license plates shall be uniform
throughout each classification of registration. The director may provide for the arrangement
of the numbers in groups or otherwise, and for other distinguishing marks on the plates.
3. All property-carrying commercial motor vehicles to be registered at a gross weight
in excess of twelve thousand pounds, all passenger-carrying commercial motor vehicles, local
transit buses, school buses, trailers, semitrailers, motorcycles, motortricycles, autocycles,
motorscooters, and driveaway vehicles shall be registered with the director of revenue as
provided for in subsection 3 of section 301.030, or with the state highways and transportation
commission as otherwise provided in this chapter, [but] and only one license plate shall be
issued for each such vehicle, except as provided in this subsection. The applicant for
registration of any property-carrying commercial vehicle registered at a gross weight in
excess of twelve thousand pounds may request and be issued two license plates for such
vehicle, and if such plates are issued, the director of revenue shall provide for distinguishing
marks on the plates indicating one plate is for the front and the other is for the rear of such

HB 1995 3
vehicle. The director may assess and collect an additional charge from the applicant in an
amount not to exceed the fee prescribed for personalized license plates in subsection 1 of
section 301.144.
4. The plates issued to manufacturers and dealers shall bear the letters and numbers as
prescribed by section 301.560, and the director may place upon the plates other letters or
marks to distinguish commercial motor vehicles and trailers and other types of motor
vehicles.
5. No motor vehicle or trailer shall be operated on any highway of this state unless it
shall have displayed thereon the license plate or set of license plates issued by the director of
revenue or the state highways and transportation commission [and authorized by section
301.140]. Each such plate shall be securely fastened to the motor vehicle or trailer in a
manner so that all parts thereof shall be plainly visible and reasonably clean so that the
reflective qualities thereof are not impaired. Each such plate may be encased in a transparent
cover so long as the plate is plainly visible and its reflective qualities are not impaired. The
license [plates] plate shall be fastened to all motor vehicles except trucks, tractors, truck
tractors or truck-tractors licensed in excess of twelve thousand pounds on the [front and] rear
of such vehicles not less than eight nor more than forty-eight inches above the ground, with
the letters and numbers thereon right side up. The license plates on trailers, motorcycles,
motortricycles, autocycles, and motorscooters shall be displayed on the rear of such vehicles
either horizontally or vertically, with the letters and numbers plainly visible. The license plate
on buses, other than school buses, and on trucks, tractors, truck tractors or truck-tractors
licensed in excess of twelve thousand pounds shall be displayed on the front of such vehicles
not less than eight nor more than forty-eight inches above the ground, with the letters and
numbers thereon right side up or if two plates are issued for the vehicle pursuant to subsection
3 of this section, displayed in the same manner on the front and rear of such vehicles. The
license plate or plates [authorized by section 301.140] issued by the director of revenue or
the state highways and transportation commission, when properly attached, shall be prima
facie evidence that the required fees have been paid.
6. (1) The director of revenue shall issue annually or biennially a tab or set of tabs as
provided by law as evidence of the annual payment of registration fees and the current
registration of a vehicle in lieu of the plate or set of plates. Beginning January 1, 2010, the
director may prescribe any additional information recorded on the tab or tabs to ensure that
the tab or tabs positively correlate with the license plate or plates issued by the department of
revenue for such vehicle. Such tabs shall be produced in each license bureau office.
(2) The vehicle owner to whom a tab or set of tabs is issued shall affix and display
such tab or tabs in the designated area of the license plate, no more than one per plate.

HB 1995 4
(3) A tab or set of tabs issued by the director of revenue when attached to a vehicle in
the prescribed manner shall be prima facie evidence that the registration fee for such vehicle
has been paid.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the director of revenue shall issue
plates for a period of at least six years.
(5) For those commercial motor vehicles and trailers registered pursuant to section
301.041, the plate issued by the highways and transportation commission shall be a
permanent nonexpiring license plate for which no tabs shall be issued. Nothing in this section
shall relieve the owner of any vehicle permanently registered pursuant to this section from the
obligation to pay the annual registration fee due for the vehicle. The permanent nonexpiring
license plate shall be returned to the highways and transportation commission upon the sale or
disposal of the vehicle by the owner to whom the permanent nonexpiring license plate is
issued, or the plate may be transferred to a replacement commercial motor vehicle when the
owner files a supplemental application with the Missouri highways and transportation
commission for the registration of such replacement commercial motor vehicle. Upon
payment of the annual registration fee, the highways and transportation commission shall
issue a certificate of registration or other suitable evidence of payment of the annual fee, and
such evidence of payment shall be carried at all times in the vehicle for which it is issued.
(6) Upon the sale or disposal of any vehicle permanently registered under this section,
or upon the termination of a lease of any such vehicle, the permanent nonexpiring plate issued
for such vehicle shall be returned to the highways and transportation commission and shall
not be valid for operation of such vehicle, or the plate may be transferred to a replacement
vehicle when the owner files a supplemental application with the Missouri highways and
transportation commission for the registration of such replacement vehicle. If a vehicle which
is permanently registered under this section is sold, wrecked or otherwise disposed of, or the
lease terminated, the registrant shall be given credit for any unused portion of the annual
registration fee when the vehicle is replaced by the purchase or lease of another vehicle
during the registration year.
7. The director of revenue and the highways and transportation commission may
prescribe rules and regulations for the effective administration of this section. No rule or
portion of a rule promulgated under the authority of this section shall become effective unless
it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of section 536.024.
100 8. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, owners of motor
101 vehicles other than apportioned motor vehicles or commercial motor vehicles licensed in
102 excess of twenty-four thousand pounds gross weight may apply for special personalized
103 license plates. Vehicles licensed for twenty-four thousand pounds that display special
104 personalized license plates shall be subject to the provisions of subsections 1 and 2 of section

HB 1995 5
105 301.030. On and after August 28, 2016, owners of motor vehicles, other than apportioned
106 motor vehicles or commercial motor vehicles licensed in excess of twenty-four thousand
107 pounds gross weight, may apply for any preexisting or hereafter statutorily created special
108 personalized license plates.
109 9. No later than January 1, 2019, the director of revenue shall commence the
110 reissuance of new license plates of such design as approved by the advisory committee under
111 section 301.125 consistent with the terms, conditions, and provisions of section 301.125 and
112 this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in this section, in addition to all other fees
113 required by law, applicants for registration of vehicles with license plates that expire during
114 the period of reissuance, applicants for registration of trailers or semitrailers with license
115 plates that expire during the period of reissuance and applicants for registration of vehicles
116 that are to be issued new license plates during the period of reissuance shall pay the cost of
117 the plates required by this subsection. The additional cost prescribed in this subsection shall
118 not be charged to persons receiving special license plates issued under section 301.073 or
119 301.443. Historic motor vehicle license plates registered pursuant to section 301.131 and
120 specialized license plates are exempt from the provisions of this subsection. Except for new,
121 replacement, and transfer applications, permanent nonexpiring license plates issued to
122 commercial motor vehicles and trailers registered under section 301.041 are exempt from the
123 provisions of this subsection.
✔